Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4533.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [115A.9175] SITING PROHIBITION FOR DISPOSAL FACILITIES. new text end new text begin The commissioner must not issue a solid waste management facility permit to a new disposal facility if the facility site is within 1,320 feet of an elementary or secondary school. new text end